Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2127.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1704-K(c) and 1705-K(b) introductory paragraph of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1704-K. Waterfront development organizations.* * *(c) Approval timeline.--No later than 60 days after [a waterfront development organization has submitted] submission of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 an application under [this section] subsections (a) and (b), the department shall notify a waterfront development organization if the organization meets the requirements of [this section] subsections (a) and (b) for the current fiscal year.* * *(e) Renewal timeline.--No later than 60 days after a waterfront development organization files a renewal application under subsection (d), the department shall notify the waterfront development organization if the organization meets the requirements of subsection (d) for the current fiscal year.Section 1705-K. Waterfront development projects.* * *(b) Submission.--After approval of a waterfront development organization's application under section 1704-K(c)[,] or simultaneous with the filing of a waterfront development organization's renewal application under section 1704-K(d), the organization may submit, on a form and in a manner required by the department, waterfront development projects for approval by the department. The submission shall include for each waterfront development project:* * *(i) Care and maintenance.--No more than 15% of the contributions received under this article may be reserved for future physical maintenance and operation of facilities of waterfront development projects approved under subsection (b).Section 2. Sections 1706-K(c) and 1708-K(1) and (4) of the act are amended to read:Section 1706-K. Tax credit.* * *(c) Availability of tax credits.--Tax credits shall be made 20260HB2127PN2749 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available by the department, based on [a first-come, first-served basis] criteria published by the department, within the limitation established under section 1708-K.* * *Section 1708-K. Limitations.The following limitations shall apply to the tax credits:(1) No tax credit may exceed [75%] 90% of the total contribution made by a business firm during a taxable year.* * *(4) The total amount of all tax credits shall not exceed [$5,000,000] $10,000,000 in any one fiscal year.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2127PN2749 - 3 - 12345678910111213